Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-218
Constitutional convention; candidates; petition; form.

Nominating petitions shall comply with section 32-628 and shall be in substantially the following form:

I, ..................., do hereby announce myself as a candidate for member of the constitutional convention to be convened December ......, 20...., I reside at ...................... in the ......... legislative district, and I will qualify as a member of the constitutional convention if elected.

.............................

To the Secretary of State

We, the undersigned electors of the ........ legislative district of Nebraska, do hereby petition that ................... be named as a member of the constitutional convention to be convened December .........., 20...., from the ....... legislative district, and we do each hereby separately recommend his or her election as such.

Name
Address

..............................
..................................

..............................
..................................

..............................
..................................

State of Nebraska)

)
ss.

.......... County)

The undersigned having signed the foregoing petition and being first duly sworn on oath state that the foregoing petition is bona fide in every respect to the best of our knowledge and belief.

......................

......................

......................

......................

......................

Subscribed and sworn to before me this ...... day of ............. 20.... .

......................

Notary Public

The Secretary of State shall prepare and have printed suitable blank forms. Supplies thereof shall be mailed to the several county clerks.

Laws 1953, c. 173, § 7, p. 550;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 564;

Laws 2004, LB 813, § 20.